Colorado, session 2026A, SB102.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Colorado and the United States are experiencing rapid and
unprecedented growth in data centers, which presents significant
challenges for electric utilities, the electric grid, regulators, and electricity
consumers statewide;
(b) Absent clear statutory direction and appropriate safeguards,
the costs of serving new large-load data centers may be shifted to
residential, commercial, and other existing ratepayers, increasing
electricity bills and creating financial risk from overbuilt or stranded
generation, transmission, and distribution infrastructure;
(c) At a time when electricity demand is increasing and
affordability is a growing concern for Colorado households, costs to serve
large-load data centers should not shift onto other ratepayers;
(d) Unchecked growth in large-load data centers may increase
reliance on fossil fuel generation, hinder electric utilities' ability to meet
state and utility clean energy and greenhouse gas emission reduction
requirements, and adversely affect public health and disproportionately
impacted communities;
(e) The general assembly has established statewide climate, clean
-4- SB26-102

energy, and emission reduction goals, including a goal of reaching
net-zero emissions by 2050, which require that new electricity demand be
met through prudent planning, investment in zero-emission resources, and
avoidance of unnecessary fossil fuel expansion;
(f) Maintaining affordable electricity for all Coloradans requires
consumer protection guardrails to ensure that large-load data centers bear
the incremental costs of the generation, transmission, and distribution
infrastructure necessary to serve them;
(g) Operators of large-load data centers should help Colorado
meet its clean energy and climate goals and be responsible for paying
their fair share of the costs of new energy infrastructure and grid
investments needed to meet the demand of large-load data centers;
(h) Flexible load and behind-the-meter resources, when designed
and deployed to provide dispatchable capacity, can reduce peak demand,
defer or avoid distribution and transmission system upgrades, and
mitigate ratepayer impacts associated with large-load data center
interconnections;
(i) Managing large-load data center growth should advance
affordability, reliability, and electrification, ensuring that large-load data
center development strengthens, rather than undermines, Colorado's clean
energy transition;
(j) Colorado rivers have experienced severe water stress in recent
years due to overuse and climate change. New large water users like
large-load data centers may threaten Colorado's water supply security and
the state's ability to provide reliable water resources for other critical
water users, including communities, tribal nations, agricultural users,
recreational users, and the environment.
-5- SB26-102

(k) Promoting the efficient and maximum utilization of Colorado's
water resources by large-load data centers through requiring transparency
of use and sourcing and maximizing sustainable and water-smart cooling
technologies can increase communities' resilience to drought and climate
change, reduce the sale of agricultural water rights in response to
increased demand for municipal water use, and protect river flows and
aquifer levels;
(l) Certain information regarding sources and usage of both water
and energy by large-load data centers is critical to decision-making
processes and should be made available to relevant local and state
authorities;
(m) Colorado has experienced decades of population growth that
has resulted in greatly increased pressure on natural resources, including
land, water, and wildlife. The siting and development of new large-load
data centers and associated infrastructure, including on-site generation
resources and other electrical infrastructure, can result in habitat loss and
fragmentation without appropriate measures to avoid, minimize, and
mitigate direct, indirect, and cumulative impacts to wildlife resources.
The siting and development of new large-load data centers must be
balanced with the obligation of the state to protect wildlife resources and
the hunting, fishing, and recreation traditions that they support, which
traditions are an important part of the economy and culture of Colorado.
(n) The cumulative impacts of pollution are even more devastating
for communities of color and low-income communities who bear outsized
environmental burdens due to past and present discriminatory
environmental and land use policies, endure higher health risks from
pollution exposure, experience systemic injustice, and have faced
-6- SB26-102

exclusion from government and industry decision-making and
enforcement efforts; and
(o) Data center development should support Colorado's workforce
and communities by adhering to high labor standards.
(2) It is therefore in the best interests of the state of Colorado to
establish a comprehensive framework for large-load data centers that:
(a) Ensures electricity service that is clean, affordable, and
reliable;
(b) Protects consumers and communities, including
disproportionately impacted communities;
(c) Advances the state's climate and clean energy goals; and
(d) Affirms the authority of the public utilities commission and
local governments to oversee new large-load data center development in
an equitable and responsible manner.
(3) It is the intent of the general assembly that nothing in this act:
(a) Alters the greenhouse gas emission reduction goals and
deadlines established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g), Colorado Revised
Statutes;
(b) Diminishes the air quality control commission's existing
authority to require more than the minimum greenhouse gas emission
reduction goals and deadlines established in section 25-7-102 (2)(g),
Colorado Revised Statutes; or
(c) Prevents state or local authorities from enacting additional
requirements for large-load data centers.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 2.5 to title
40 as follows:
ARTICLE 2.5
-7- SB26-102

Large-load Data Centers
40-2.5-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 2.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CLOSED-LOOP COOLING SYSTEM" MEANS A COOLING
CONFIGURATION THAT OPERATES BY RECIRCULATING AIR, WATER,
REFRIGERANTS, OR OTHER HEAT-TRANSFER MEDIUMS WITHIN SEALED OR
SELF-CONTAINED EQUIPMENT TO ABSORB AND REJECT HEAT WITHOUT
EXPOSURE TO THE ATMOSPHERE OR ROUTINE EVAPORATIVE WATER LOSS.
(2) "CUMULATIVE IMPACTS" MEANS THE INCREMENTAL EFFECTS
THAT A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER HAS ON THE ENVIRONMENT,
INCLUDING EFFECTS ON AIR QUALITY, WATER QUALITY, WATER RESOURCE
AVAILABILITY, CLIMATE, NOISE, ODOR, WILDLIFE, AND PUBLIC HEALTH,
WHEN ADDED TO THE IMPACTS FROM OTHER PAST, PRESENT, AND
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE FUTURE DEVELOPMENT OF ANY TYPE ON A
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY.
(3) "DATA CENTER" MEANS A FACILITY THAT:
(a) HOUSES INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT USED FOR
DATA PROCESSING, DATA STORAGE, OR TELECOMMUNICATIONS; AND
(b) HAS THE PRIMARY FUNCTION OF DELIVERING ONE OR MORE
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, INCLUDING:
(I) PROVIDING DATA STORAGE, PROCESSING, AND TRANSPORT
SERVICES;
(II) SUPPORTING THE DELIVERY OF CLOUD COMPUTING SERVICES;
(III) PROVIDING NETWORK CONNECTIVITY SERVICES; AND
(IV) SUPPORTING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, MACHINE LEARNING,
OR SIMILAR COMPUTATIONAL SERVICES.
-8- SB26-102

(4) "EMERGENCY" MEANS AN UNPLANNED AND INVOLUNTARY
INTERRUPTION OF UTILITY ELECTRIC SERVICE OR A CONDITION POSING AN
IMMINENT RISK TO PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY THAT IS DOCUMENTED AND
VERIFIED BY THE SERVING ELECTRIC UTILITY.
(5) "HOURLY MATCHING" MEANS THE DEMONSTRATED
PROPORTION OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER'S HOURLY ENERGY USAGE
MET BY PURCHASED OR GENERATED RENEWABLE RESOURCES,
REPRESENTED AS A PERCENTAGE AND DEMONSTRATED WITH CERTIFIED
THIRD-PARTY ACCOUNTING, AS APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.
(6) "LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER" MEANS:
(a) A DATA CENTER THAT BEGINS OPERATION ON OR AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION:
(I) WITH A PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN THIRTY MEGAWATTS; OR
(II) THAT IS COVERED BY AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT THAT
ALLOWS FOR A PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN THIRTY MEGAWATTS;
(b) MULTIPLE DATA CENTERS THAT BEGIN OPERATION ON OR
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION AND THAT:
(I) HAVE A COLLECTIVE PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN SIXTY
MEGAWATTS; OR
(II) ARE COVERED BY AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT OR
MULTIPLE INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENTS THAT ALLOW FOR A
COLLECTIVE PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN SIXTY MEGAWATTS;
(c) A DATA CENTER EXISTING BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION THAT, ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION:
(I) ADDS A PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN THIRTY MEGAWATTS; OR
(II) SIGNS A NEW INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT THAT ALLOWS
FOR ADDING A PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN THIRTY MEGAWATTS; OR
-9- SB26-102

(d) MULTIPLE DATA CENTERS EXISTING BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SECTION THAT, ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION:
(I) ADD A COLLECTIVE PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN SIXTY
MEGAWATTS AT MULTIPLE DATA CENTERS; OR
(II) SIGN A NEW INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT THAT ALLOWS
FOR ADDING A COLLECTIVE PEAK LOAD OF MORE THAN SIXTY MEGAWATTS
AT MULTIPLE DATA CENTERS.
(7) "LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPER" OR "DEVELOPER"
MEANS A PERSON THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE INITIAL DEVELOPMENT OF
A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE OF LAND AND
THE CONSTRUCTION OF INFRASTRUCTURE INTENDED FOR A LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER.
(8) "LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR" OR "OPERATOR"
MEANS AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
(9) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A STATUTORY OR HOME RULE
CITY, TOWN, COUNTY, OR CITY AND COUNTY.
(10) "MULTIPLE DATA CENTERS" MEANS ALL DATA CENTERS THAT
ARE:
(a) LOCATED ON A SINGLE SITE OR ON CONTIGUOUS SITES; AND
(b) OWNED OR OPERATED BY THE SAME PERSON OR BY A PERSON
THAT CONTROLS, IS CONTROLLED BY, OR IS UNDER COMMON CONTROL
WITH THE OTHER PERSON.
(11) "OFFICE" MEANS THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38.5-101.
(12) "PEAK LOAD" MEANS THE PEAK POWER CONSUMPTION TO BE
USED BY A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, MEASURED IN MEGAWATTS.
-10- SB26-102

(13) "POWER-USAGE EFFECTIVENESS" MEANS THE TOTAL
ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DIVIDED BY
THE ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING COMPUTING, STORAGE, AND NETWORKING
EQUIPMENT, IN THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER ON AN ANNUAL BASIS,
EXPRESSED AS A NUMBER.
(14) "RENEWABLE ENERGY STORAGE" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 40-2-124 (1)(a)(VII.5).
(15) "RENEWABLE RESOURCE" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
"RENEWABLE ENERGY RESOURCES" AS DEFINED IN SECTION 40-2-124
(1)(a)(VII).
(16) "USE BY RIGHT" MEANS A LAND USE THAT PROCEEDS UNDER
OBJECTIVE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN ZONING OR OTHER LOCAL
GOVERNMENT LAWS AND THAT DOES NOT HAVE A DISCRETIONARY
APPROVAL PROCESS.
(17) "WATER-USAGE EFFECTIVENESS" MEANS THE TOTAL WATER
CONSUMPTION OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, INCLUDING DIRECT AND
INDIRECT WATER USAGE, DIVIDED BY THE ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING COMPUTING,
STORAGE, AND NETWORKING EQUIPMENT, IN THE LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, EXPRESSED AS LITERS PER
KILOWATT-HOUR.
40-2.5-102. Hourly matching requirements - determination by
commission.
(1) NO LATER THAN JUNE 30, 2030, THE COMMISSION SHALL, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE AND THE AIR POLLUTION CONTROL
DIVISION IN THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT AND
-11- SB26-102

FOLLOWING A NONADJUDICATORY PROCEEDING WITH THE OPPORTUNITY
FOR PUBLIC INPUT, MAKE A DETERMINATION ON WHETHER
ONE-HUNDRED-PERCENT HOURLY MATCHING BY LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTERS IS TECHNICALLY AND ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT ACHIEVING
ONE-HUNDRED-PERCENT HOURLY MATCHING BY LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTERS IS NOT TECHNICALLY AND ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE, THE
COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE AND THE AIR POLLUTION
CONTROL DIVISION AND FOLLOWING A NONADJUDICATORY PROCEEDING
WITH THE OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC INPUT, SHALL MAKE A
DETERMINATION OF THE HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF HOURLY MATCHING BY
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS THAT IS TECHNICALLY AND ECONOMICALLY
FEASIBLE.
(3) AFTER THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THE HIGHEST
PERCENTAGE OF HOURLY MATCHING BY LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS THAT
IS TECHNICALLY AND ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE, THE COMMISSION, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE AND THE AIR POLLUTION CONTROL
DIVISION AND FOLLOWING A NONADJUDICATORY PROCEEDING WITH THE
OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC INPUT, SHALL UPDATE THIS PERCENTAGE ON A
REGULAR BASIS BUT NO LESS FREQUENTLY THAN EVERY THREE YEARS
AFTER THE DATE OF THE MOST RECENT DETERMINATION.
(4) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER THE ROLE OF FLEXIBLE LOAD, ENERGY
EFFICIENCY, DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES, AND VIRTUAL POWER
PLANTS IN REDUCING PEAK DEMAND AND IMPROVING UTILIZATION OF
RENEWABLE RESOURCES.
40-2.5-103. Large-load data center requirements - utilization
-12- SB26-102

of renewable resources - utility infrastructure and program
contribution obligations - backup generation requirements.
(1) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL, BEGINNING
JANUARY 1, 2031:
(a) GENERATE, PURCHASE, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE A QUANTITY
OF ELECTRICITY GENERATED FROM RENEWABLE RESOURCES NECESSARY
TO MEET ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER'S TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION FOR EACH YEAR
THAT THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IS OPERATIONAL;
(b) GENERATE, PURCHASE, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE A QUANTITY
OF ELECTRICITY AND ASSOCIATED RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS
GENERATED FROM RENEWABLE RESOURCES FOR THE OPERATOR'S
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER NECESSARY TO ACHIEVE AT LEAST THE
HIGHEST PERCENTAGE OF HOURLY MATCHING THAT THE COMMISSION
DETERMINES IS TECHNICALLY AND ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE FOR
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2.5-102; AND
(c) ENSURE THAT THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
COMPLIES WITH THE HOURLY MATCHING REQUIREMENT DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2.5-102 IN EFFECT AT THE
TIME THAT THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER ENTERS INTO, RENEWS, OR
MATERIALLY AMENDS A POWER PURCHASE AGREEMENT, RENEWABLE
ENERGY CONTRACT, OR COMMISSION-APPROVED CLEAN ENERGY TARIFF
USED FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) (a) THE RENEWABLE RESOURCES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION MUST BE NEW AND INCREMENTAL RESOURCES
DELIVERABLE TO THE ELECTRIC GRID SERVING THE LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER OR DELIVERABLE DIRECTLY TO THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
-13- SB26-102

(b) ANY RENEWABLE ENERGY CREDITS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
ELECTRICITY GENERATED FROM RENEWABLE RESOURCES USED TO MEET
THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MUST
BE RETIRED BY THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR OR ON BEHALF
OF THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR IN THE YEAR THAT THE
ELECTRICITY IS GENERATED.
(3) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL IMPLEMENT ITS
COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION THROUGH ONE OF THE FOLLOWING OR A COMBINATION OF
THE FOLLOWING METHODS, WHICH MUST COVER ALL OF THE OPERATOR'S
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER'S ELECTRICITY DEMANDS:
(a) A TARIFF, CONTRACT, OR PROGRAM ENTERED INTO WITH THE
UTILITY SUPPLYING THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER WITH ELECTRICITY;
(b) ONE OR MORE POWER PURCHASE AGREEMENTS ENTERED INTO
WITH AN INDEPENDENT POWER PRODUCER SUPPLYING THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER WITH ELECTRICITY; OR
(c) SELF-SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY, INCLUDING BEHIND-THE-METER
GENERATION OF RENEWABLE RESOURCES, OR RENEWABLE ENERGY
STORAGE USED TO SERVE THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER'S ELECTRICITY
DEMANDS.
(4) THROUGH CONTRACTS WITH UTILITIES OF AT LEAST FIFTEEN
YEARS, IF USING UTILITY POWER SUPPLY, A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
OPERATOR SHALL PAY FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(a) ALL OF THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A UTILITY CONSTRUCTING
OR PROCURING GENERATION, TRANSMISSION, AND DISTRIBUTION
INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO SUPPLY THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER WITH ELECTRICITY;
-14- SB26-102

(b) THE OPERATOR'S SHARE OF EXISTING GENERATION,
TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, AND OTHER RESOURCES NEEDED TO SERVE
THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER AND OTHER ENERGY SUPPLY
AND OPERATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE AND EQUIPMENT REQUIRED TO
MAINTAIN GRID RELIABILITY AND OPERATIONAL PERFORMANCE FOR OTHER
CUSTOMERS; AND
(c) ALL OF THE COSTS OF RENEWABLE RESOURCE ELECTRICITY
CURTAILMENTS AND RESERVE REQUIREMENTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
OPERATOR'S RENEWABLE RESOURCE ELECTRICITY PURCHASES AND OF
INFRASTRUCTURE AND INVESTMENTS REQUIRED TO MAINTAIN GRID
SERVICE, STABILITY, AND RELIABILITY DUE TO STRESS ON THE ELECTRICAL
SYSTEM CAUSED BY THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
(5) (a) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL
CONTRIBUTE TO UTILITY DEMAND-SIDE MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS. THE
AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT THE OPERATOR IS REQUIRED TO CONTRIBUTE
MUST BE BASED ON THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER'S TOTAL ANNUAL
ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION AND THE COST-RECOVERY MECHANISMS THAT
FUND THE DEMAND-SIDE MANAGEMENT PROGRAMS.
(b) SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER OPERATOR REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE ELECTRICITY IS
SUPPLIED BY A UTILITY OR ANOTHER SOURCE AS LONG AS THE
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IS CONNECTED TO THE UTILITY'S SYSTEM.
(6) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL OPTIMIZE
OPERATIONAL WATER MANAGEMENT THROUGH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
WATER-EFFICIENT TECHNOLOGY, AS DETERMINED BY A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
(7) (a) (I) ON-SITE BACKUP POWER SERVING A LARGE-LOAD DATA
-15- SB26-102

CENTER MUST MAXIMIZE RELIANCE ON RENEWABLE RESOURCES AND
RENEWABLE ENERGY STORAGE, TO THE EXTENT TECHNICALLY AND
ECONOMICALLY FEASIBLE.
(II) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR MAY RELY ON
ON-SITE, COMBUSTION-BASED BACKUP GENERATION ONLY AFTER
EVALUATING AND DEPLOYING NONCOMBUSTION BACKUP ALTERNATIVES
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE.
(b) IF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER USES ONE OR MORE ON-SITE
COMBUSTION GENERATORS FOR BACKUP GENERATION, THE GENERATOR
MUST:
(I) BE LIMITED TO USE IN AN EMERGENCY AND FOR REQUIRED
TESTING AND MAINTENANCE. THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF USE FOR REQUIRED
TESTING AND MAINTENANCE MUST BE FOR NO MORE THAN FIFTY HOURS
PER YEAR.
(II) NOT BE USED FOR ROUTINE PEAK SHAVING, ECONOMIC
DISPATCH, CAPACITY OR ANCILLARY SERVICE MARKETS, OR ANY
NONEMERGENCY GRID SUPPORT; AND
(III) USE NONRESETTABLE METERS TO TRACK OPERATING HOURS.
(c) IF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER USES ONE OR MORE ON-SITE
COMBUSTION GENERATORS POWERED BY FUEL OIL FOR BACKUP
GENERATION, THE GENERATOR MUST:
(I) MEET OR EXCEED THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY'S TIER 4 FINAL EMISSIONS STANDARDS FOR
STATIONARY COMPRESSION-IGNITION ENGINES IN EFFECT ON THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION;
(II) UTILIZE ULTRA-LOW SULFUR DIESEL; AND
(III) BE EQUIPPED WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE EMISSIONS CONTROL
-16- SB26-102

TECHNOLOGIES TO ACHIEVE THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY'S TIER 4 FINAL EMISSIONS STANDARDS FOR
STATIONARY COMPRESSION-IGNITION ENGINES IN EFFECT ON THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING DIESEL PARTICULATE
FILTERS AND SELECTIVE CATALYTIC REDUCTION CONTROLS, WHICH MUST
BE PROPERLY OPERATED AND MAINTAINED.
(d) IF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER USES ONE OR MORE ON-SITE,
GAS-POWERED COMBUSTION GENERATORS FOR BACKUP GENERATION:
(I) ANY STATIONARY SPARK-IGNITION ENGINES MUST MEET OR
EXCEED THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S
EMISSIONS STANDARDS FOR STATIONARY SPARK-IGNITION ENGINES IN
EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION;
(II) ANY STATIONARY COMBUSTION TURBINES MUST MEET OR
EXCEED THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY'S
EMISSIONS STANDARDS FOR STATIONARY COMBUSTION TURBINES IN
EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE GENERATORS MUST EMPLOY THE BEST AVAILABLE
METHANE LEAK DETECTION AND REPAIR PRACTICES AND PROHIBIT
ROUTINE VENTING OR BYPASSING OF EMISSIONS CONTROLS.
40-2.5-104. Reporting to the department of public health and
environment.
(1) NO LATER THAN JUNE 30, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN EACH
JUNE 30 THEREAFTER, A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL
REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR FOR THE
OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER:
(a) TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION;
-17- SB26-102

(b) PEAK LOAD;
(c) TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRICITY SUPPLY SERVING THE
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) ELECTRICITY PURCHASED FROM OFF-SITE RENEWABLE
RESOURCES, BY SOURCE;
(II) ELECTRICITY PURCHASED FROM OFF-SITE NONRENEWABLE
RESOURCES, BY SOURCE;
(III) ELECTRICITY GENERATED ON SITE FROM RENEWABLE
RESOURCES;
(IV) ELECTRICITY DISCHARGED ON SITE FROM RENEWABLE
ENERGY STORAGE; AND
(V) ELECTRICITY GENERATED ON SITE FROM NONRENEWABLE
RESOURCES, INCLUDING COMBUSTION-BASED BACKUP GENERATION;
(d) HOURLY CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY PROVIDED FOR EIGHT
THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED SIXTY HOURS;
(e) HOURLY ELECTRICITY SUPPLY FROM RENEWABLE RESOURCES
FOR EIGHT THOUSAND SEVEN HUNDRED SIXTY HOURS;
(f) TOTAL INSTALLED CAPACITY OF:
(I) ON-SITE RENEWABLE RESOURCES, BY FUEL TYPE AND IN
MEGAWATTS;
(II) ON-SITE RENEWABLE ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY, IN
MEGAWATTS AND IN MEGAWATT-HOURS; AND
(III) ON-SITE BACKUP GENERATION, BY FUEL TYPE AND IN
MEGAWATTS;
(g) TOTAL ANNUAL HOURS OF OPERATION FOR EACH ON-SITE
BACKUP GENERATOR, DISAGGREGATED BY FUEL TYPE AND BY USE
CATEGORY, INCLUDING FOR EMERGENCY USE AND USE IN TESTING OR
-18- SB26-102

MAINTENANCE;
(h) TOTAL ANNUAL DISCHARGE FROM RENEWABLE ENERGY
STORAGE;
(i) POWER-USAGE EFFECTIVENESS;
(j) TOTAL ANNUAL WATER CONSUMPTION, INCLUDING PEAK WATER
DEMAND PER DAY, TYPES OF COOLING TECHNOLOGIES EMPLOYED, AND
EFFORTS TO IMPROVE ON-SITE WATER EFFICIENCY AND REUSE;
(k) TOTAL WATER INPUT IN CUBIC METERS THAT INCLUDES ALL
WATER VOLUMES THAT ENTER THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER THAT ARE
USED FOR THE FUNCTIONS OF THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER;
(l) THE SOURCES OF WATER FOR THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER,
INCLUDING MUNICIPAL WATER SUPPLY, GROUNDWATER, AND SURFACE
WATER, AND WHETHER WATER FROM THE SOURCES IS POTABLE OR
RECLAIMED. IF THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER UTILIZES MORE THAN ONE
WATER SOURCE, THE OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE INFORMATION REGARDING
WATER USAGE FROM EACH SOURCE AS A PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL WATER
USAGE.
(m) WATER-USAGE EFFECTIVENESS; AND
(n) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INCENTIVES OR SUBSIDIES RECEIVED BY
THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENTS,
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ORGANIZATIONS, OR OTHER ENTITIES FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT OF THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT SHALL COMPILE THE
INFORMATION REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1) OF THIS SECTION AND PROVIDE AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY AND THE COMMISSION AND MAKE THE ANNUAL REPORT
-19- SB26-102

PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE.
40-2.5-105. Utility requirements - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "UTILITY" INCLUDES:
(a) A COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 40-9.5-102 (1);
(b) A MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITY; AND
(c) A WHOLESALE ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
40-2-134 (2).
(2) (a) A UTILITY SHALL NOT INTERCONNECT OR SUPPLY
ELECTRICITY TO A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER UNLESS THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER OPERATOR HAS EITHER FIRST PROVIDED AN UP-FRONT
PAYMENT OR ENTERED INTO A CONTRACT OF AT LEAST FIFTEEN YEARS
WITH THE UTILITY, WHICH UP-FRONT PAYMENT OR CONTRACT MUST
REQUIRE THE OPERATOR TO PAY FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(I) ALL OF THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE UTILITY
CONSTRUCTING OR PROCURING GENERATION, TRANSMISSION, AND
DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO SUPPLY THE OPERATOR'S
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER WITH ELECTRICITY;
(II) THE OPERATOR'S SHARE OF EXISTING GENERATION,
TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, AND OTHER RESOURCES NEEDED TO SERVE
THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER AND OTHER ENERGY SUPPLY
AND OPERATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE AND EQUIPMENT REQUIRED TO
MAINTAIN GRID RELIABILITY AND OPERATIONAL PERFORMANCE FOR THE
UTILITY'S OTHER CUSTOMERS; AND
(III) ALL OF THE COSTS OF RENEWABLE RESOURCE ELECTRICITY
CURTAILMENTS AND RESERVE REQUIREMENTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
-20- SB26-102

OPERATOR'S RENEWABLE RESOURCE ELECTRICITY PURCHASES AND THE
COSTS OF INFRASTRUCTURE AND INVESTMENTS REQUIRED TO MAINTAIN
GRID SERVICE, STABILITY, AND RELIABILITY DUE TO STRESS ON THE
ELECTRICAL SYSTEM CAUSED BY THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER.
(b) IN ESTABLISHING COST ALLOCATION IN ELECTRICITY RATES, A
UTILITY SHALL ACCOUNT FOR COST CAUSATION FOR LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTERS ACROSS ALL HOURS OF THE YEAR.
(c) A UTILITY MAY REQUIRE A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IN THE
UTILITY'S SERVICE TERRITORY WITH A SELF-SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY TO
ENTER INTO A CONTRACT OR PROVIDE UP-FRONT PAYMENTS FOR THE
COSTS THAT THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IMPOSES ON THE UTILITY TO
PROVIDE BACKUP POWER.
(3) A UTILITY SHALL NOT INTERCONNECT OR SUPPLY ELECTRICITY
TO A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2031, UNLESS
IT HAS VERIFIED THAT THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE HOURLY MATCHING REQUIREMENT DETERMINED
BY THE COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-2.5-102.
(4) A UTILITY SHALL NOT OFFER ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT RATES
PURSUANT TO SECTION 40-3-104.3 TO LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS.
(5) (a) A UTILITY SHALL DEVELOP AND OFFER AT LEAST ONE OF
THE FOLLOWING TO THE UTILITY'S CUSTOMERS THAT ARE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER OPERATORS:
(I) ONE OR MORE DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAMS, WHICH
PROGRAMS MUST NOT ALLOW THE USE OF DIESEL GENERATORS, THAT
ENCOURAGE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS TO SIGNIFICANTLY
REDUCE THE POWER DEMAND OF THE OPERATOR'S LARGE-LOAD DATA
-21- SB26-102

CENTER DURING PEAK PERIODS THROUGH LOAD-SHIFTING, BATTERY
STORAGE, UNINTERRUPTIBLE POWER SUPPLY, OR ON-SITE OR
ZERO-EMISSIONS BACKUP GENERATION; OR
(II) FLEXIBLE CONNECTION TARIFFS OR OTHER TARIFFS THAT
ENCOURAGE OR REQUIRE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS TO
SIGNIFICANTLY REDUCE THE POWER DEMAND OF THE OPERATOR'S
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DURING PEAK PERIODS.
(b) A UTILITY MAY:
(I) PROVIDE EXPEDITED INTERCONNECTION TO A LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER OPERATOR THAT COMMITS TO FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION
OR COMMITS TO ACHIEVING AT LEAST EIGHTY-PERCENT HOURLY
MATCHING OF RENEWABLE RESOURCES WITH THE LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER'S ELECTRICITY CONSUMPTION BY 2030; AND
(II) REQUIRE FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION AS A CONDITION FOR
INTERCONNECTION OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER.
(c) AN INTERCONNECTION AGREEMENT BETWEEN A UTILITY AND
A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR MUST INCLUDE A REQUIREMENT
FOR AN UP-FRONT PAYMENT OR SECURITY BY THE LARGE-LOAD DATA
CENTER OPERATOR AND SIGNIFICANT MONTHLY DEMAND CHARGES,
UNLESS THE OPERATOR PARTICIPATES IN A FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION
TARIFF OR PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES SYSTEM BENEFITS FOR WHICH
CORRESPONDING CHARGES MAY BE REDUCED WITHOUT CREATING
CROSS-SUBSIDIZATION BY OTHER CUSTOMER CLASSES.
(6) (a) A UTILITY SHALL NOT INTERCONNECT OR SUPPLY
ELECTRICITY TO A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER UNLESS THE UTILITY HAS
DETERMINED AND ENSURES THAT THE ADDITION OF THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER TO THE UTILITY'S SYSTEM:
-22- SB26-102

(I) DOES NOT NEGATIVELY AFFECT THE UTILITY'S ABILITY TO
PROVIDE RELIABLE ELECTRIC SERVICE TO EXISTING CUSTOMERS;
(II) DOES NOT NEGATIVELY AFFECT THE UTILITY'S ABILITY TO
COMPLY WITH SECTION 25-7-105 OR THE RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 25-7-105 OR THE UTILITY'S ACHIEVEMENT OF THE CLEAN ENERGY
TARGETS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 40-2-125.5 (3), IF APPLICABLE, OR OTHER
APPLICABLE CLEAN ENERGY AND EMISSIONS TARGETS, INCLUDING
ECONOMY-WIDE TARGETS; AND
(III) DOES NOT INCREASE THE UTILITY'S GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS FOR THE FIFTEEN YEARS AFTER THE ADDITION OF THE
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, COMPARED TO PROJECTED GREENHOUSE GAS
EMISSIONS BY THE UTILITY WITHOUT THE ADDITION OF THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER.
(b) ANY COSTS INCURRED BY A UTILITY IN MAKING THE
DETERMINATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST
BE BORNE BY THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER SEEKING INTERCONNECTION.
(7) (a) A UTILITY SHALL SOLICIT AND ACCEPT, IF OFFERED BY A
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR, VOLUNTARY FINANCIAL
CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE UTILITY'S INCOME-QUALIFIED ENERGY EFFICIENCY,
ELECTRIFICATION, DEMAND RESPONSE, DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES,
OR VIRTUAL POWER PLANT PROGRAMS.
(b) IF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR PROVIDES A
VOLUNTARY FINANCIAL CONTRIBUTION, THE VOLUNTARY FINANCIAL
CONTRIBUTION MUST SUPPLEMENT, RATHER THAN SUBSTITUTE, THE
UTILITY'S FUNDING OF THE PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF
THIS SECTION. A VOLUNTARY FINANCIAL CONTRIBUTION BY A LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER OPERATOR IS NOT SUBJECT TO COST-EFFECTIVENESS
-23- SB26-102

TESTING AND SHALL NOT BE COUNTED AS PART OF UTILITY EXPENDITURES
RELATIVE TO ANY BUDGET CAPS FOR THE PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) A UTILITY THAT RECEIVES A VOLUNTARY FINANCIAL
CONTRIBUTION FROM ONE OR MORE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
OPERATORS SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT THE VOLUNTARY
FINANCIAL CONTRIBUTION, INCLUDING THE AMOUNT RECEIVED, HOW THE
MONEY WAS USED, AND ANY DEMONSTRATED CUSTOMER OR GRID
BENEFITS, IN THE UTILITY'S ANNUAL ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND
ELECTRIFICATION REPORTS.
(8) (a) A UTILITY RATE-REGULATED BY THE COMMISSION WITH ONE
OR MORE CUSTOMERS THAT ARE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS
SHALL DESCRIBE THE UTILITY'S EFFORTS TO COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION
IN THE UTILITY'S ANNUAL REPORT FILED WITH THE COMMISSION.
(b) A UTILITY RATE-REGULATED BY THE COMMISSION WITH ONE OR
MORE CUSTOMERS THAT ARE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS
SHALL PROVIDE MONTHLY REPORTING TO THE COMMISSION ON THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) NUMBER AND CAPACITY OF NEW LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
INTERCONNECTION REQUESTS;
(II) NUMBER AND CAPACITY OF NEW LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
INTERCONNECTION REQUESTS REJECTED BY THE UTILITY OR WITHDRAWN;
(III) TOTAL CAPACITY OF NEW LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
INTERCONNECTION REQUESTS IN QUEUE WITH A SIGNED INTERCONNECTION
AGREEMENT; AND
(IV) NUMBER AND CAPACITY OF NEW LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
CUSTOMER INTERCONNECTIONS COMPLETED AND IN OPERATION.
-24- SB26-102

(9) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS THE COMMISSION FROM
ADOPTING A TARIFF FOR LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS, OR A
SUBSET OF LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS, THAT INCLUDES MORE
STRINGENT REQUIREMENTS THAN THIS SECTION.
40-2.5-106. Model local codes by the department of local
affairs - site assessments.
(1) (a) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL
AFFAIRS SHALL PUBLISH MODEL CODES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS. THE MODEL CODES MUST CONSIDER, AT A
MINIMUM, BEST PRACTICES FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(I) UPDATING LOCAL ZONING LAWS TO RESPOND TO THE
PROLIFERATION OF LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS;
(II) AVOIDING AND MITIGATING POTENTIAL NEW IMPACTS TO
RESIDENTS FROM NOISE, LIGHT, AIR, ELECTROMAGNETIC FIELDS, AND
OTHER SOURCES OF POLLUTION, INCLUDING FROM ON-SITE BACKUP
GENERATION;
(III) UPDATING PUBLIC ENGAGEMENT PROCESSES RELATED TO
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT;
(IV) ESTABLISHING WATER AND LAND USE POLICY MECHANISMS
AND DEVELOPMENT REVIEW PROCESSES TO ALIGN LARGE WATER USER
DEVELOPMENT WITH SUSTAINABLE WATER MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING
WATER-RELATED SITING CONSIDERATIONS, THE USE OF NONPOTABLE
SUPPLIES AND ON-SITE WATER REUSE, AND WATER EFFICIENCY TOOLS AND
TECHNOLOGY. THE POLICY MECHANISMS AND DEVELOPMENT REVIEW
PROCESSES MAY INCLUDE:
(A) ESTABLISHING ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR LARGE WATER
USERS;
-25- SB26-102

(B) IMPLEMENTING WATER DEMAND OFFSET OR NET NEUTRAL
GROWTH POLICIES;
(C) ADOPTING WATER ALLOCATION POLICIES WITH QUANTIFIED
WATER RESOURCES FOR WATER INTENSIVE INDUSTRIAL GROWTH;
(D) REQUIRING CONSERVATION PLANS WITH IDENTIFIED
EFFICIENCY AND REUSE BEST PRACTICES IN WATER SERVICE APPLICATIONS;
OR
(E) DEVELOPING REPORTING GUIDANCE AND TEMPLATES FOR
WATER AND WASTE USE STREAMS;
(V) REQUIRING A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPER TO
PROVE TO A LOCAL GOVERNMENT IN ITS DEVELOPMENT PERMIT
APPLICATION HOW THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER PROJECT WILL FIT
WITHIN LOCAL GOVERNMENT STRATEGIC PLANNING AND LAWS WITH
CLEAR AND TRANSPARENT TIMELINES, PLANS, AND ACCOUNTABILITY
MEASURES;
(VI) CREATING AND IMPLEMENTING COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENTS, INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS FOR PUBLIC ENGAGEMENT;
AND
(VII) IMPLEMENTING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS TO LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS AND IMPACTED COMMUNITIES RELATED TO ON-SITE FOSSIL
FUEL GENERATION.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS SHALL CONDUCT A
ROBUST STAKEHOLDER AND ENGAGEMENT PROCESS IN DEVELOPING THE
MODEL CODES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING ENGAGEMENT WITH:
(I) STATE AGENCIES, INCLUDING THE AIR POLLUTION CONTROL
DIVISION AND THE WATER QUALITY CONTROL DIVISION IN THE
-26- SB26-102

DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT, THE COMMISSION,
THE OFFICE, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
(II) COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ORGANIZATIONS;
(III) STATEWIDE LABOR AND TRADE ASSOCIATIONS;
(IV) STATEWIDE ENERGY AND CLIMATE ORGANIZATIONS;
(V) COLORADO AGRICULTURAL INTERESTS;
(VI) DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITIES;
(VII) LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPERS;
(VIII) LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATORS;
(IX) TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS;
(X) MUNICIPAL WATER UTILITIES; AND
(XI) MUNICIPAL ELECTRIC UTILITIES AND COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC
ASSOCIATIONS.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS SHALL EVALUATE,
UPDATE, AND REVIEW THE MODEL CODES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)
OF THIS SECTION EVERY FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE PUBLISHING
OF THE MODEL CODES.
(2) WITH ITS DEVELOPMENT PERMIT APPLICATION FOR A
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPER
SHALL SUBMIT A SITE ASSESSMENT TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
REVIEWING THE DEVELOPMENT PERMIT APPLICATION. A SITE ASSESSMENT
MUST INCLUDE DESCRIPTIONS OF:
(a) ANTICIPATED TOTAL WATER FOOTPRINT, INCLUDING DIRECT
AND INDIRECT WATER USAGE AND TOTAL WATER INPUT IN CUBIC METERS;
(b) PLANNED WATER SOURCES, INCLUDING INFORMATION
REGARDING WATER USAGE FROM EACH SOURCE AS A PERCENTAGE OF
TOTAL WATER USAGE;
-27- SB26-102

(c) ANTICIPATED ON-SITE AIR EMISSIONS, INCLUDING EMISSIONS OF
GREENHOUSE GASES; TOXIC AIR CONTAMINANTS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
25-7-109.5 (1)(i); AND CRITERIA POLLUTANTS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
43-1-128 (2)(b);
(d) ANY POTENTIAL IMPACTS ON AGRICULTURAL, HISTORIC, AND
CULTURAL RESOURCES WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S JURISDICTION;
(e) EFFORTS TO LOCATE BACKUP GENERATION AND OTHER
SOURCES OF AIR, NOISE, AND LIGHT POLLUTION AS FAR AS REASONABLY
POSSIBLE FROM RESIDENCES, SCHOOLS, AND HEALTH CLINICS; AND
(f) A DESCRIPTION OF INITIAL AND ONGOING OPPORTUNITIES FOR
PUBLIC ENGAGEMENT.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ESTABLISHES, ALTERS, IMPAIRS, OR
NEGATES THE ABILITY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO REGULATE LAND USE
RELATED TO LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS; EXCEPT THAT A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL NOT ALLOW LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTERS TO BE
ZONED AS A USE BY RIGHT.
40-2.5-107. Disproportionately impacted communities -
cumulative impacts analysis - review of development permit
application by local governments - community engagement -
community benefit agreements.
(1) (a) IF THE SITING OF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IS PROPOSED
IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY OR IF AN OPERATOR OF
A DATA CENTER IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY THAT
EXISTS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION PLANS TO EXPAND
THE DATA CENTER'S PEAK LOAD SUCH THAT THE DATA CENTER WILL
BECOME A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
DEVELOPER OR LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR, AS APPLICABLE,
-28- SB26-102

SHALL UNDERGO A CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS BEFORE THE
DEVELOPMENT OR EXPANSION BEGINS.
(b) IN CONDUCTING THE CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A DEVELOPER OR
OPERATOR SHALL CONTRACT WITH A THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR
SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT TO
PERFORM THE CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS IN A SCIENTIFICALLY
RIGOROUS MANNER. THE COSTS OF THE THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR MUST
BE BORNE ENTIRELY BY THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR.
(2) IN REVIEWING, APPROVING, DENYING, OR AMENDING A
DEVELOPMENT PERMIT APPLICATION FOR A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
THAT IS IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY OR IS
PROPOSED TO BE IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY,
INCLUDING A DEVELOPMENT PERMIT MODIFICATION THAT WOULD CAUSE
A DATA CENTER IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY TO
BECOME A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, THE APPLICABLE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL CONSIDER THE APPLICANT'S CUMULATIVE IMPACTS
ANALYSIS. IF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT FINDS THAT THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER PROPOSED BY THE APPLICATION WILL HAVE NET NEGATIVE
CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ON A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITY, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL CONSIDER IF MITIGATION
STRATEGIES DESCRIBED BY THE APPLICANT ARE SUFFICIENT TO AVOID THE
NEGATIVE IMPACTS IDENTIFIED IN THE CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS.
THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY CONSULT WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT REGARDING THE RESULTS OF THE
CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS AND PROPOSED MITIGATION STRATEGIES.
IN REVIEWING, APPROVING, DENYING, OR AMENDING AN APPLICATION, THE
-29- SB26-102

LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL INCLUDE A PLAIN LANGUAGE SUMMARY OF ITS
DETERMINATION.
(3) (a) PRIOR TO APPLYING FOR A DEVELOPMENT PERMIT FOR A
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER THAT IS IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITY OR IS PROPOSED TO BE IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITY, INCLUDING A DEVELOPMENT PERMIT MODIFICATION THAT
WOULD CAUSE A DATA CENTER IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITY TO BECOME A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, THE LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER DEVELOPER OR LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR, AS
APPLICABLE, SHALL:
(I) HOST A MINIMUM OF THREE PUBLIC HEARINGS OR COMMENT
PERIODS AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS PRIOR TO SUBMITTING THE DEVELOPMENT
PERMIT APPLICATION. AT LEAST ONE OF THE PUBLIC HEARINGS OR
COMMENT PERIODS MUST BE HELD WITHIN THE DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED COMMUNITY WHERE THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR PLANS TO
OPERATE THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OR IS CURRENTLY OPERATING
THE DATA CENTER.
(II) SCHEDULE VARIABLE TIMES OF DAY AND DAYS OF THE WEEK
FOR OPPORTUNITIES FOR PUBLIC INPUT ON THE PROJECT, INCLUDING AT
LEAST ONE TIME ON SATURDAY OR SUNDAY, ONE TIME AFTER 5 P.M., AND
ONE TIME BEFORE 12 NOON;
(III) PROVIDE PUBLIC NOTICE AT LEAST THIRTY DAYS BEFORE ANY
PUBLIC HEARING OR BEFORE THE START OF ANY COMMENT PERIOD, WHICH
PUBLIC NOTICE MUST INCLUDE THE TIME, PLACE, AND LOCATION OF THE
PUBLIC HEARING AND A SUMMARY OF THE PROJECT AND MAY BE PROVIDED
THROUGH SEVERAL DIFFERENT OUTLETS AND LOCATIONS, INCLUDING:
(A) SCHOOLS;
-30- SB26-102

(B) HEALTH CLINICS;
(C) SOCIAL MEDIA;
(D) SOCIAL AND ACTIVITY CLUBS;
(E) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(F) TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS;
(G) RELIGIOUS OR CIVIC ORGANIZATIONS;
(H) COMMUNITY-BASED ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE
ORGANIZATIONS; OR
(I) OTHER LOCAL SERVICES;
(IV) PROVIDE OUTREACH MATERIALS TRANSLATED INTO THE TOP
TWO LANGUAGES SPOKEN IN THE DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITY WHERE THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR PLANS TO DEVELOP OR
OPERATE OR IS OPERATING THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, WHICH
MATERIALS INFORM THE DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY
ABOUT OPPORTUNITIES TO PROVIDE INPUT ON THE PROJECT, THE RIGHTS OF
THE COMMUNITY, THE POSSIBLE OUTCOMES OF THE PROJECT, AND ANY
UPCOMING PUBLIC HEARINGS OR COMMENT PERIODS; AND
(V) IMPLEMENT OTHER BEST PRACTICES FOR OUTREACH AND
ENGAGEMENT SET FORTH IN SECTION 24-4-109 (3)(b).
(b) DURING A PUBLIC HEARING OR COMMENT PERIOD DESCRIBED
IN THIS SUBSECTION (3), THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER DEVELOPER OR
LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL EXPLICITLY DISCLOSE THE
RESULTS OF THE CUMULATIVE IMPACTS ANALYSIS CONDUCTED BY A
THIRD-PARTY CONTRACTOR PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION. THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR SHALL ALSO DESCRIBE THE
EFFORTS THAT THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR WILL MAKE TO REDUCE
ANTICIPATED NEGATIVE IMPACTS TO THE DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
-31- SB26-102

COMMUNITY OR ITS ENVIRONMENT FROM THE PROPOSED LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER PROJECT.
(4) (a) IF A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER IS PROPOSED IN A
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY OR IF AN OPERATOR OF A
DATA CENTER IN A DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY THAT
EXISTS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION PLANS TO EXPAND
THE DATA CENTER'S PEAK LOAD SUCH THAT THE DATA CENTER WILL
BECOME A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER, THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR, AS
APPLICABLE, SHALL ENTER INTO A LEGALLY BINDING AND PUBLICLY
DISCLOSED COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT WITH THE
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITY BEFORE THE DEVELOPMENT
OR EXPANSION BEGINS.
(b) (I) DURING COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT NEGOTIATIONS,
THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR SHALL CONSULT WITH THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER
OR PROPOSED LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER PROJECT AND A COALITION OF
AT LEAST THREE COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS WITHIN A TWO-MILE
RADIUS OF THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OR PROPOSED LARGE-LOAD
DATA CENTER PROJECT. THE DEVELOPER OR OPERATOR SHALL HOST A
SERIES OF AT LEAST FIVE MEETINGS WITH KEY STAKEHOLDER GROUPS
IDENTIFIED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND COALITION. AT LEAST TWO
OF THE MEETINGS MUST OFFER THE OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT.
THE MEETINGS MUST COMPLY WITH THE BEST PRACTICES FOR OUTREACH
AND ENGAGEMENT SET FORTH IN SECTION 24-4-109 (3)(b).
(II) IN NEGOTIATING A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT, THE
PARTIES SHALL CONSIDER:
(A) THE PRIORITIZATION OF DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
-32- SB26-102

COMMUNITIES THROUGH FIRST-SOURCE HIRING PROGRAMS, REVENUE
SHARING, COMMUNITY PROGRAM FUNDING, COMMUNITY OR PUBLIC
OWNERSHIP REQUIREMENTS, AND OTHER STATE-INITIATED MECHANISMS;
AND
(B) REGULAR EQUITY IMPACT ASSESSMENTS, PROTECTIONS FOR
RENTERS AND SMALL BUSINESSES, AND PUBLIC DASHBOARDS FOR
DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION DEEMED RELEVANT BY THE COALITION OF
COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(c) (I) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHOULD AIM TO AVOID
AND MITIGATE NEGATIVE IMPACTS FROM THE LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER,
DRIVE INVESTMENTS AND SERVICES REQUESTED BY DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED COMMUNITIES, AND SUPPORT LOCAL WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT.
(II) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT MAY CONTEMPLATE A
COMMUNITY BENEFIT FUND TIED TO PROJECT SCALE, ENVIRONMENTAL AND
PUBLIC HEALTH, LONG-TERM SUBSIDIES AND MONITORING, AND
SUPPORTING HOUSING, BROADBAND, HEALTH-CARE AND CHILD CARE
CENTERS, AND COMMUNITY RESILIENCE.
(d) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY DETERMINE APPROPRIATE
PENALTIES FOR NONCOMPLIANCE WITH A COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENT.
40-2.5-108. Labor standards.
(1) A LARGE-LOAD DATA CENTER OPERATOR SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE PREVAILING WAGES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-92-201 (6) AND DETERMINED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-92-205 (1), TO EMPLOYEES THAT
-33- SB26-102

ARE FULLY EMPLOYED, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-70-103 (12.5);
(b) PARTICIPATE IN AN APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM REGISTERED
WITH THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR OR A STATE
APPRENTICESHIP AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR;
(c) REQUIRE PARTICIPATION IN THE "OSHA 10" CLASS OR A CLASS
OFFERED BY THE FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION COMPRISED OF SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR CONTENT;
(d) COMPLY WITH ANY APPLICABLE WORKPLACE SITE SAFETY PLAN
REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(e) NOT HAVE A DOCUMENTED PATTERN OF WAGE THEFT OR
MISCLASSIFICATION OF EMPLOYEES, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-72-114
(2)(f).
SECTION 3. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-34- SB26-102